Mississippi, session 2026, HB1929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Administrative Expense Account of the Public Employees' Retirement System for the purpose of defraying the administrative expenses of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System, or out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Retirement System Building Account of the Public Employees' Retirement System for the purpose of maintenance and general operation of the Retirement System Building, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..................... $ 21,201,795.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                        $ 0.00 Special Funds:              $  12,997,770.00 Total Funds:                $  12,997,770.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages and Fringe Benefits:           $  12,174,763.00 Progressions:                         $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $     823,007.00 Total Personal Services:     $  12,997,770.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   168 Time-Limited: 0 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits. Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2027 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2027 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2027 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2027 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2028, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2027. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2026. If the agency fills additional headcounts after February 1, 2026, until the end of Fiscal Year 2026, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally adjusted to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions or increase the Personal Services total without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2026 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2026 to Fiscal Year 2027, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2026.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 4.  In accordance with the purposes of this article, there shall be established in the State Treasury the Public Employees' Retirement System Building Repair and Maintenance Fund, into which shall be deposited all funds collected as rental income from the building owned by the system located at 301 North President Street, Jackson, Mississippi.  At the end of each fiscal year, any and all unexpended funds shall be transferred to the Administrative Budget Fund of the system. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, no more than Three Million Five Hundred Thirty-eight Thousand Dollars ($3,538,000.00) is provided for the purpose of defraying those expenses associated with maintaining, upgrading and operating the computer system. SECTION 7.  As a condition of expending the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System shall live webcast and record all board and committee meetings, excluding any executive sessions of the board under the provision of the Mississippi Open Meetings Act. Archived footage or a weblink to the archived footage shall be posted on the agency website within Forty-eight (48) hours of the date and time the meeting was held. SECTION 8.  The Public Employees' Retirement System is further authorized, in its discretion, to expend funds for the purchase of service pins for employees of the Public Employees' Retirement System. SECTION 9.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, no more than Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) is provided, only for the explicit purpose of building maintenance and repair. SECTION 10.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Public Employees' Retirement System for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds as authorized in House Bill 36, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, to provide for the implementation of Tier 5, including legal or other costs related to the initial creation of the plan document, investment lineup, or other aspects of the Defined Contribution portion of Tier 5 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..... ................................................ $ 164,858.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under the provisions of this section, in no event shall the amount expended exceed the unexpended balances as of June 30, 2026. In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 12.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.